District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-406

Certain land granted for colored schools to revert to United States.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-45, § 2, 34 DCR 6845
July 25, 1990, D.C. Law 8-149, § 2, 37 DCR 3717
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-29, § 2, 38 DCR 4213
Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 401, 44 DCR 7378
Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-224, § 2, 46 DCR 483
1981 Ed., § 31-206.
1973 Ed., § 31-807.
Temporary Repeal of Section Section 2 of D.C. Law 13-220 repealed this section.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 13-220 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2 of the Lovejoy School new Housing and Economic Development Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-461, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9440).